Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2792YC (2) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 483A.24, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2025, 1 are amended by striking the subsections. 2 Sec. 2. Section 483A.24, subsection 5, unnumbered paragraph 3 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 Seventy-five of the nonresident deer hunting licenses 5 allocated under subsection 3 and twenty-five of the wild 6 turkey hunting licenses allocated under subsection 4 shall 7 be available The director shall provide up to seventy-five 8 nonresident deer hunting licenses and up to twenty-five 9 nonresident turkey hunting licenses for issuance to 10 nonresidents who have served in the armed forces of the United 11 States on active federal service and who were disabled during 12 the veteranâs military service or who are serving in the 13 armed forces of the United States on active federal service 14 and have been disabled during military service to enable the 15 disabled person to participate in a hunt that is conducted by 16 an organization that conducts hunting experiences in this state 17 for disabled persons. The licenses shall be issued as follows: 18